Mississippi, session 2026, SB2790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Responsible Firearm Purchasing Act." SECTION 2.  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context indicates otherwise: (a) "Ammunition" means ammunition or cartridge cases, primers, bullets or propellent powder designed for use in any firearm. (b)  "Armor piercing ammunition" means: (i)  A projectile or projectile core which may be used in a handgun and which is constructed entirely (excluding the presence of traces of other substances) from one (1) or a combination of tungsten alloys, steel, iron, brass, bronze, beryllium copper or depleted uranium; or (ii)  A full jacketed projectile larger than .22 caliber designed and intended for use in a handgun and whose jacket has a weight of more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the total weight of the projectile. The term "armor piercing ammunition" does not include shotgun shot required by federal or state environmental or game regulations for hunting purposes, a frangible projectile designed for target shooting, a projectile which the Attorney General finds is primarily intended to be used for sporting purposes, or any other projectile or projectile core which the Attorney General finds is intended to be used for industrial purposes, including a charge used in an oil and gas well perforating device. (c)  "Antique firearm" shall have the meaning provided in the United State Code. (d) "Firearm" means: (i)  Any weapon (including a starter gun) which will or is designed to or may readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive; (ii)  The frame or receiver of any such weapon; (iii)  Any firearm muffler or firearm silencer; or (iv)  Any destructive device. The term "firearm" does not include an antique firearm. (e)  The terms "firearm silencer" and "firearm muffler" mean any device for silencing, muffling, or diminishing the report of a portable firearm, including any combination of parts, designed or redesigned, and intended for use in assembling or fabricating a firearm silencer or firearm muffler, and any part intended only for use in such assembly or fabrication. (f)  The term "handgun" means: (i)  A firearm which has a short stock and is designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand; and (ii)  Any combination of parts from which a firearm described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph can be assembled. SECTION 3. (1)  It shall be unlawful for a minor in this state to purchase a firearm, handgun, ammunition or armor piercing ammunition. (2)  It shall be unlawful to sell a minor in this state a firearm, handgun, ammunition or armor piercing ammunition. SECTION 4. The purchase of a firearm, handgun, ammunition or armor piercing ammunition shall comply with all standards as provided by federal and state law. SECTION 5.  A minor who violates Section 2 of this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon adjudication, the minor shall be fined no more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or subject to a term of imprisonment no longer than thirty (30) days, or both. SECTION 6.  A person who is twenty-one (21) years old or older and violates Section 2 or 3 of this act shall be guilty of a felony.  Upon conviction, the defendant shall be fined no more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) or subject to a term of imprisonment of no longer than two (2) years in the custody of the Department of Corrections, or both. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.